Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2,134
Duty to act in good faith.

After the court, under section 76-2,132, approves relocation of an easement and the servient estate owner commences the relocation, the servient estate owner, the easement holder, and other parties in the civil action shall act in good faith to facilitate the relocation in compliance with the Uniform Easement Relocation Act.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 71.